Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6601
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that quality health care be provided to all citizens of the state who receive home health aide services through a licensed home health agency. A method of accomplishing quality health care is to ensure adequate training of unlicensed personnel who provide home health aide services by establishing minimum standards for training, evaluation, and supervision. The purpose of sections 71-6601 to 71-6615 is to establish requirements for the provision of home health aide services.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 116;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 53.